District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Schools First Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title I of the Schools First in Budgeting Amendment Act of 2022, effective March
10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-300; D.C. Official Code § 38-2851.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 102 (D.C. Official Code § 38-2851.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1A) is redesignated as paragraph (1B).
(2) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Average position cost” means the cost, including salary and benefits, of a
school-based educator that DCPS uses to calculate each school’s annual budget for the next
fiscal year.”.
(b) Section 104(a) (D.C. Official Code § 38-2851.03(a)), is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; or” in its place.
(C) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C) The projected increase in the average position cost.”.
(2) Paragraph (6)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “instructional or school-
based support personnel” and inserting the phrase “instructional personnel” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (7A) is added to read as follows:
“(7A) As applicable, decrease the amount derived pursuant to paragraph (7) of
this subsection to account for the reduction of instructional or school-based support personnel
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
resulting from the elimination of a grade level due to a school or campus closure over multiple
years.”.
(4) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase “paragraph (7)” and inserting
the phrase “paragraph (7A)” in its place.
(5) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “paragraph (7)” and inserting
the phrase “paragraph (8)” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2